Arkansas, session 2025, HB1544.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - REAL PROPERTY TAX REDUCTION - COUNTIES.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Office of the Treasurer of State, to be
payable from the Property Tax Relief Trust Fund, for distributing funds
provided by a statewide property tax reduction to counties by the Office of
the Treasurer of State which shall be supplemental and in addition to those
funds appropriated in Section 7 of Act 140 of 2024, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) DISTRIBUTION TO COUNTIES FOR PROPERTY
TAX RELIEF $25,000,000

*JAR048*
02-25-2025 09:16:44 JAR048

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 HB1544
SECTION 2. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 3. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 4. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that funds provided by the General Assembly for the operations of
the Office of the Treasurer of State are, due to unforeseen circumstances,
insufficient for the Office of the Treasurer of State to continue to provide
essential governmental services; that the provisions of this act will provide
the necessary monies for the Office of the Treasurer of State to continue
such services; and that a delay in the effective date of this Act could work
irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential
governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist
and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the
date of its passage and approval.
If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall
become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the
Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the
veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house
overrides the veto.
02-25-2025 09:16:44 JAR048

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 HB1544

/s/Joint Budget Committee


































02-25-2025 09:16:44 JAR048